Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-925
Department; furnish statement.

The department shall furnish to each qualified applicant for and each qualified recipient of medical assistance a clear and simple written statement explaining the provisions of section 68-922.

Laws 1988, LB 419, § 6;

Laws 1989, LB 362, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 337;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 68-1043;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 254.